Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.06A.010 and 2013 c 23 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:There is hereby created an office of the family and children's ombuds within the office of the governor for the purpose of promoting public awareness and understanding of family, youth, and children services provided by the department of children, youth, and families, identifying system issues and responses for the governor and the legislature to act upon, and monitoring and ensuring compliance with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to family, youth, and children's services and the placement, supervision, and treatment of children, youth, and individuals in the state's care or in state-licensed facilities or residences and juvenile rehabilitation facilities. The ombuds shall report directly to the governor and shall exercise ((his or her))the ombuds' powers and duties independently of the secretary.Sec. 2. RCW 43.06A.030 and 2018 c 58 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The ombuds shall perform the following duties:(((1)))(a) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving services from the department of children, youth, and families, including family, youth, and children's services, juvenile justice, juvenile rehabilitation, and child early learning, and on the procedures for providing these services;(((2)))(b) Investigate, upon ((his or her))the ombud's own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act by the department of children, youth, and families alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombuds may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;(((3)))(c) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the department of children, youth, and families to carry out its responsibilities in delivering family, youth, and children's services and juvenile rehabilitation services, with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and ensuring ((children's)) health and safety;(((4)))(d) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions including juvenile rehabilitation facilities serving children, youth, individuals, and families, and state-licensed facilities or residences;(((5)))(e) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of children, youth, individuals, and families, who receive care or services from the department of children, youth, and families;(((6)))(f) Submit annually to the oversight board for children, youth, and families created in RCW 43.216.015 and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the work of the department of children, youth, and families, including recommendations;(((7)))(g) Grant the oversight board for children, youth, and families access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombuds unless prohibited by law; and(((8)))(h) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.(2) For the purposes of this section, "child, youth, or individual" includes any person in the state's care or in state-licensed facilities or residences and juvenile rehabilitation facilities who is receiving services from the department of children, youth, and families.Sec. 3. RCW 43.06A.100 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 810 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department of children, youth, and families shall:(a) Allow the ombuds or the ombuds's designee to communicate privately with any child or person in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families, or any child or person who is part of a near fatality investigation by the department of children, youth, and families, for the purposes of carrying out its duties under this chapter;(b) Permit the ombuds or the ombuds designee physical access to state institutions serving children, youth, and families, including juvenile rehabilitation facilities and state licensed facilities or residences, for the purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter;(c) Upon the ombuds's request, grant the ombuds or the ombuds's designee the right to access, inspect, and copy all relevant information, records, or documents in the possession or control of the department of children, youth, and families that the ombuds considers necessary in an investigation; and(d) Grant the office of the family and children's ombuds unrestricted online access to the child welfare case management information system, the juvenile rehabilitation case management system, and the department of children, youth, and families data information system for the purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter.(2) For the purposes of this section((, "near)):(a) "Near fatality" means an act that, as certified by a physician, places the child or person in serious or critical condition.(b) "Child, youth, or individual" includes any person in the state's care or in state-licensed facilities or residences and juvenile rehabilitation facilities who is receiving services from the department of children, youth, and families.(3) Nothing in this section creates a duty for the office of the family and children's ombuds under RCW 43.06A.030 as related to children in the care of an early learning program described in RCW 43.216.500 through 43.216.550, a licensed child care center, or a licensed child care home.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---